Utah statutes.
6-1-17.   Removal of assignee.

Upon a written application of a majority of the creditors in amount the court shall remove the assignee and appoint in his stead a person approved by the creditors in the same number and amount, and the person so removed shall immediately turn over to the clerk of the court, or any person appointed by the court, all money and property of the estate in his hands.

